California statutes. Business and Professions Code
(2) Every petition for redetermination shall be in writing and shall state the specific grounds upon which the petition is founded. The petition may be amended to state additional grounds at anytime prior to the date on which the board issues its order or decision upon the petition for redetermination.

(3) If the
 petition for redetermination is filed within the 30-day period, the board shall reconsider the determination of the denial and, if the manufacturer or the importer has so requested in the petition, shall grant an oral hearing and shall give the manufacturer or the importer at least 10 days’ notice of the time and place of the hearing. The board may continue the hearing from time to time as may be necessary.

(4) The order or decision of the board upon a petition for redetermination becomes final 30 days after mailing of notice thereof.

(g) In any action brought by the Attorney General or the board to enforce this division, Sections 104555 to 104557, inclusive, of the Health and Safety Code, Part 13 (commencing with Section 30001) of Division 2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, or regulations adopted thereto, including, but not limited to, an action to suspend or revoke a license issued under this section, if the licensee raises a sovereign immunity defense with respect to an aspect of that proceeding, the license in question shall be subject to revocation. In the event of a revocation under this subdivision, the person whose license has been revoked shall not be eligible for a license under this section in the future, unless that person agrees to waive any sovereign immunity defense that may apply to an enforcement action brought by the Attorney General or the board to enforce this division, Sections 104555
 to 104557, inclusive, of the Health and Safety Code, Part 13 (commencing with Section 30001) of Division 2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, or regulations adopted thereto. The Attorney General shall inform the board in the event a sovereign immunity defense is raised by a licenseholder.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 607, Sec. 5.5.   (AB 2733)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

22979.1.

(a) An application for a license by a manufacturer or by an importer shall be on a form prescribed by the board and shall include the following:

(1) The name, address, and telephone number of the applicant. The business name, address, and telephone number of the corporate offices. Citations issued to licensees shall be forwarded to all addressees on the license.

(2) License number for any other valid licenses or permits issued by the board.

(3) Signature of the applicant under oath to verify application information.

(4) The name, address, and telephone number of the person designated by the manufacturer or the importer as its agent for receipt of service of process in this state.

(5) Any other information the board may require.

(b) The board may conduct an inquiry to determine whether the applicant complies with the provisions of this division.

(c) The board shall provide electronic means for applicants to download and submit applications.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 890, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

22979.2.

(a) On or before January 1, 2004, every manufacturer and every importer shall pay to the board an administration fee. The amount of the administration fee shall be one cent ($0.01) per package of cigarettes (1) manufactured or imported by the manufacturer or the importer and (2) shipped into this state during the 2001 calendar year as reported to the board. The board shall notify each manufacturer and each importer of the amount due under this section.

(b) This section shall apply to every manufacturer and every importer required to be licensed pursuant to Section 22979. All manufacturers and all importers that may become eligible for licensure on or after December 1, 2003, shall be notified by the board of the appropriate fee due and shall pay that fee within 90 days of notification.

(c) All manufacturers and all importers that begin operations in the state after enactment of this division shall be charged a fee commensurate with their respective market share of (1) cigarettes manufactured or imported by the manufacturer or the importer and (2) sold in this state during the next calendar year as estimated by the board. The fee shall be at an amount not less than that paid pursuant to subdivision (a) by the smallest manufacturer, but may not be more than that paid by the eighth largest manufacturer.

(d) The board shall administer this fee in accordance with the Fee Collection Procedures Law, Part 30 (commencing with Section 55001) of Division 2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 512, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

22979.21.

Every manufacturer or importer of tobacco products shall obtain and maintain a license under this division to engage in the sale of tobacco products. In order to be eligible for obtaining and maintaining a license under this division, a manufacturer or importer shall do all of the following in the manner specified by the board:

(a) Submit to the board a list of all tobacco products they manufacture or import.

(b) Update the list of all tobacco products brands they manufacture or import whenever a new or additional brand is manufactured or imported or a listed brand is no longer manufactured or imported.

(c) Consent to jurisdiction of the California courts for the purpose of enforcement of this division and appoint a registered agent for service of process in this state and identify the registered agent to the board.

(d) The Legislature finds that solely appointing a registered agent for the purpose of service of process in this state pursuant to this subdivision does not establish a nexus with this state for tax purposes.

(e) This section shall become operative May 1, 2007.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 501, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2007.   Section operative May 1, 2007, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

22979.22.

(a) An application for a license by a manufacturer or by an importer of tobacco products shall be on a form prescribed by the board and shall include the following:

(1) The name, address, and telephone number of the applicant. For applicants whose corporate offices are at a separate location, the business name, address, and telephone number of the corporate office. Citations issued to licensees shall be forwarded to all addressees on the license.

(2) If any other licenses have been issued by the board to the applicant, the license or permit numbers for each license or permit then in effect.

(3) A statement by the applicant affirming that the applicant has not been convicted of a felony and has not violated and will not violate or cause or permit to be violated any of the provisions of this division or any rule of the board applicable to the applicant or pertaining to the manufacture, sale, or distribution of cigarettes or tobacco products. If the applicant is unable to affirm this statement, the application shall contain a statement by the applicant of the nature of any violation or the reasons that will prevent the applicant from complying with the requirements with respect to the statement.

(4) A statement by the applicant that the contents of the application are complete, true, and correct. Any person who signs a statement pursuant to this subdivision that asserts the truth of any material matter that he or she knows to be false is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment of up to one year in the county jail, or a fine of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000), or both imprisonment and fine.

(5) Signature of the applicant.

(6) The name, address, and telephone number of the person designated by the manufacturer or the importer as its agent for receipt of service of process in this state.

(7) Any other information the board may require.

(b) The board may investigate to determine the truthfulness and completeness of the information provided in the application.

(c) The board shall provide electronic means for applicants to download and submit applications.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 501, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

22979.23.

(a) Every manufacturer or importer of chewing tobacco or snuff shall submit with each application a one-time license fee of ten thousand dollars ($10,000).

(b) Every manufacturer or importer of tobacco products, excluding chewing tobacco or snuff, shall submit with each application a one-time license fee of two thousand dollars ($2,000).

(c) If a manufacturer or importer is required to submit an application under, and to pay the fees required by, both subdivisions (a) and (b), the total amount of fees required to be submitted under this section shall not exceed ten thousand dollars ($10,000).

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 501, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

22979.24.

(a) Every manufacturer or importer holding a license pursuant to Section 22979.21 shall file, using electronic media in a manner specified by the department, a monthly report to the department. The monthly report shall include, but is not limited to, the following:

(1) A list of all distributors licensed pursuant to Section 22975 to which the manufacturer or importer shipped its tobacco products or caused its tobacco products to be shipped.

(2) The total wholesale cost of the products.

(b) The department may suspend the license or revoke the license,
 pursuant to the provisions applicable to the revocation of a license set forth in Section 30148 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, of any importer or any manufacturer that has failed to comply with the requirements of this section.

(c) All information and records provided to the department pursuant to subdivision (a) are confidential in nature and shall not be disclosed by the department. Information required under subdivision (a) are not public records under the California Public Records Act, as described in Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of Title 1 of the Government Code and shall not be open to public inspection.

(d) The amendments made to this section by the act adding this subdivision shall become operative May 1, 2007.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 28, Sec. 16.   (SB 1380)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

22979.3.

The department shall, upon request, provide to the State Department of Public Health, the office of the Attorney General, a law enforcement agency, a local lead agency, and any agency authorized to enforce or administer state or local tobacco control laws, access to the department’s database of licenses issued to manufacturers and importers for locations within the jurisdiction of that agency, local lead agency, or law enforcement agency. The agencies authorized by this section to access the
 department’s database shall access and use the department’s database only for purposes of enforcing tobacco control laws and shall adhere to all state laws, policies, and regulations pertaining to the protection of personal information and individual privacy.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 432, Sec. 5.   (SB 824)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

22979.4.

All importers shall retain purchase records that meet the requirements set forth in Section 22979.5 for all cigarettes or tobacco products purchased and other records required by the board. The records shall be maintained for a period of one year from the date of purchase on the importer’s premises identified in the license, and thereafter, the records shall be made available for inspection by the board or a law enforcement agency for a period of four years. Any importer found in violation of these requirements, or any person who fails, refuses, or neglects to retain or make available invoices for inspection and copying in accordance with this section shall be subject to penalties pursuant to Section 22981.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 82, Sec. 6.   Effective June 30, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

22979.5.

(a) Each manufacturer and each importer of cigarette and tobacco products subject to licensing under this chapter shall maintain accurate and complete records relating to the sale of those products, including, but not limited to, receipts, invoices, and other records as may be required by the board, during the past four years with invoices for the past year to be maintained on the premises for which the license was issued, and shall make these records available upon request by a representative of the board or a law enforcement agency.

(b) Failure of a manufacturer or an importer to comply with this section shall be a misdemeanor subject to penalties pursuant to Section 22981.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 890, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

22979.6.

(a) Each manufacturer and each importer shall include the following information on each invoice for the sale for distribution, wholesale, or retail sale of cigarettes or tobacco products:

(1) The name, address, and telephone number of the manufacturer, or importer.

(2) The license number of the manufacturer or importer as provided by the board.

(3) The name, address, and license number of the person to whom cigarettes or tobacco products are sold.

(4) An itemized listing of the cigarettes or tobacco products sold.

(b) Each invoice for the sale of cigarettes or tobacco products shall be legible and readable.

(c) Failure to comply with the requirements of this section shall be a misdemeanor subject to penalties pursuant to Section 22981.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 890, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

22979.7.

In addition to any other civil or criminal penalty provided by law, upon a finding that a manufacturer or importer has violated any provision of this division, the board may take the following actions:

(a) In the case of the first offense, the board may revoke or suspend the license or licenses of the manufacturer or importer pursuant to the procedures applicable to the revocation of a license set forth in Section 30148 of the Revenue and Taxation Code.

(b) In the case of a second or any subsequent offense, in addition to the action authorized under subdivision (a), the board may impose a civil penalty in an amount not to exceed the greater of either of the following:

(1) Five times the retail value of the seized cigarettes or tobacco products defined as cigarettes under this section.

(2) Five thousand dollars ($5,000).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 512, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 5. Inspections, Prohibitions, and Penalties [22980. - 22983.]

22980.

(a) A peace officer or department employee granted limited peace officer status pursuant to paragraph (6) of subdivision (a) of Section 830.11 of the Penal Code, upon presenting appropriate credentials, is authorized to enter any place as described in paragraph (2) or (3) and to conduct inspections in accordance with all of the following:

(1) Inspections shall be performed in a reasonable manner and at times that are reasonable under the circumstances, taking into consideration the normal business hours of the place to be entered.

(2) Inspections may be at any place at which cigarettes or tobacco products are sold, produced, or stored or at any site where evidence of activities involving evasion of
 cigarette or tobacco products tax and violations of Section 30165.1 of the Revenue and Taxation Code may be discovered.

(3) Inspections may be at any place where evidence of a violation of Section 104559.1 or 104559.5 of the Health and Safety Code may be discovered.

(4) Inspections shall be requested or conducted no more than once in a 24-hour period.

(b) Any person that refuses to allow an inspection shall be subject to the penalties imposed pursuant to Section 22981.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 849, Sec. 4.   (AB 3218)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

22980.1.

(a) A manufacturer or importer shall not sell cigarettes or tobacco products to a distributor, wholesaler, retailer, or any other person who is not licensed pursuant to this division or whose license has been suspended or revoked.

(b) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2), a distributor or wholesaler shall not sell cigarettes or tobacco products to a retailer, wholesaler, distributor, or any other person who is not licensed pursuant to this division or whose license has been suspended or revoked.

(2) This subdivision does not apply to any sale of cigarettes or tobacco products by a distributor, wholesaler, or any other person to a retailer, wholesaler, distributor, or any
 other person that the state, pursuant to the United States Constitution, the laws of the United States, or the California Constitution, is prohibited from regulating.

(c) A retailer, distributor, or wholesaler shall not purchase packages of cigarettes or tobacco products from a manufacturer or importer who is not licensed pursuant to this division or whose license has been suspended or revoked.

(d) (1) A retailer or wholesaler shall not purchase cigarettes or tobacco products from any person who is not licensed pursuant to this division or whose license has been suspended or revoked.

(2) Notwithstanding subdivision (c), a distributor shall not purchase cigarettes or tobacco products from any person who is required to be licensed pursuant to this division but who is not licensed or whose license
 has been suspended or revoked.

(e) Each separate sale to, or by, a retailer, wholesaler, distributor, importer, manufacturer, or any other person who is not licensed pursuant to this division shall constitute a separate violation.

(f) A manufacturer, distributor, wholesaler, or importer shall not sell cigarette or tobacco products to any retailer or wholesaler whose license has been suspended or revoked unless all outstanding debts of that retailer or wholesaler that are owed to a wholesaler or distributor for cigarette or tobacco products are paid and the license of that retailer or wholesaler has been reinstated by the board. Any payment received from a retailer or wholesaler shall be credited first to the outstanding debt for cigarettes or tobacco products and must be immediately reported to the board. The board shall determine the debt status of a suspended retailer or
 wholesaler licensee 25 days prior to the reinstatement of the license.

(g) An importer, distributor, or wholesaler, or distributor functioning as a wholesaler, or retailer, shall not purchase, obtain, or otherwise acquire any package of cigarettes to which a stamp or meter impression may not be affixed in accordance with subdivision (b) of Section 30163 or subdivision (e) of Section 30165.1 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, or any cigarettes obtained from a manufacturer or importer that cannot demonstrate full compliance with all requirements of the federal Cigarette Labeling and Advertising Act (15 U.S.C. Sec. 1335a et seq.) for the reporting of ingredients added to cigarettes.

(h) (1) Failure to comply with the provisions of this section is a misdemeanor subject to penalties pursuant to Section 22981.

(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), a manufacturer or importer who uses the most up-to-date licensing information provided by the board on the board’s website to determine a person’s licensing status is presumed to be in compliance with this section.

(i) The amendments that are made to this section by the act adding this subdivision shall become operative May 1, 2007.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 497, Sec. 18.   (AB 991)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

22980.2.

(a) A person or entity that engages in the business of selling cigarettes or tobacco products in this state either without a valid license or after a license has been suspended or revoked, and each officer of any corporation that so engages in this business, is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable as provided in Section 22981.

(b) Each day after notification by the board or by a law enforcement agency that a manufacturer, wholesaler, distributor, importer, retailer, or any other person required to be licensed under this division offers cigarette and tobacco products for sale or exchange without a valid license for the location from which they are offered for sale shall constitute a separate violation.

(c) Continued sales or gifting of cigarettes and tobacco products either without a valid license or after a notification of suspension or revocation shall constitute a violation punishable as provided in Section 22981, and shall result in the seizure of all cigarettes and tobacco products in the possession of the person by the board or a law enforcement agency. Any cigarettes and tobacco products seized by the board or by a law enforcement agency shall be deemed forfeited.

(d) For the purposes of this section, notwithstanding subdivision (v) of Section 22971, “tobacco products” includes a product or device as defined in subdivision (d) of Section 22950.5.

(e) This section
 shall be operative on January 1, 2017.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 269, Sec. 9.   (AB 573)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

22980.3.

(a) Licenses issued pursuant to this division shall be subject to suspension or revocation for violations of this division or the Revenue and Taxation Code as provided in this section.

(1) In addition to any applicable fines or penalties for a violation, upon first conviction of a violation, a licensee shall receive a written notice from the board detailing the suspension and revocation provisions of this division. At its discretion, the board may also suspend a license for up to 30 days.

(2) In addition to any applicable fines or penalties for a violation, upon a second conviction of a violation within four years of
 a previous violation, the license shall be revoked.

(b) The date of the occurrence of a violation shall be used to calculate the duration between subsequent violations. A violation shall be noted in the license record at the board only after judicial conviction or final adjudication of a violation.

(c) Upon updating a record for a violation triggering a suspension, the board shall serve the licensee with a notice of suspension and shall order the licensee to cease the sale, gifting, or displaying for sale of cigarettes or tobacco products for the period of the suspension. The notice of suspension shall inform the licensee of the effective dates of the suspension.

(d) Continued sales or gifting of cigarettes or tobacco products after the effective date of the suspension shall constitute a violation of this division
 and result in the revocation of a license.

(e) Upon completion of a suspension period, a license shall be reinstated by the board upon certification that all outstanding debts of that retailer or wholesaler that are owed to a wholesaler or distributor for the purchase of cigarettes and tobacco products are paid.

(f) Upon updating a record for a violation triggering a revocation, the board shall serve the licensee with a notice of revocation and shall order the licensee to cease the sale, gifting, or displaying for sale of cigarettes or tobacco products on and after the effective date of the revocation. The notice of revocation shall inform the licensee of the effective date of the revocation.

(g) After a revocation, a previously licensed applicant may apply for a new license after six months. The board may, at its
 discretion, issue a new license.

(h) Upon updating a license record for a violation, suspension, or revocation to a license of a person or entity that owns or controls more than one location, the board shall send notice in writing of the violations, suspensions, or revocations within 15 days of the board’s action to the address included in the application and listed on the license for receipt of correspondence or notices from the board.

(i) Upon suspension or revocation of a license pursuant to this section, the board shall notify all licensed distributors and wholesalers by electronic mail within 48 hours of the suspension or revocation of that license. All licensed distributors and wholesalers shall provide the board and shall update, as necessary, an electronic mail address that the board can use for purposes of making the notifications required by this subdivision.

(j) Violations by a licensee at one location may not be accumulated against other locations of that same licensee. Violations accumulated against a prior owner at a licensed location may not be accumulated against a new owner at the same licensed location.

(k) For purposes of this section, a violation includes violations of the Revenue and Taxation Code relating to cigarettes and tobacco products, and violations of this division. Only one violation per discrete action shall be counted toward a suspension or revocation of a license.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 607, Sec. 7.   (AB 2733)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

22980.4.

A person who, after receiving a notice of suspension or revocation, continues to display for sale cigarettes or tobacco products shall be subject to a civil penalty of one thousand dollars ($1,000) for each offense, and shall not be subject to Section 22981.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 607, Sec. 8.   (AB 2733)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

22980.5.

(a) A retailer whose license has been suspended or revoked by order of the board shall conspicuously post a notice at both of the following locations:

(1) Each public entrance to the retail location. The notice shall directly face any person who enters the retail location and shall not be obstructed from view or placed at a height of less than four feet or greater than nine feet from the floor.

(2) Each cash register and other point of retail sale. The notice shall be posted so as to be readily viewable by a person standing at or approaching the cash register or other point of retail sale. The notice shall directly face the purchaser and
 shall not be obstructed from view or placed at a height of less than four feet or greater than nine feet from the floor.

(b) The notices described in this section shall be in the size and form prescribed by the board. The notice shall be provided by the board and may be reproduced in the same size and form in order to comply with subdivision (a).

(c) A retailer whose license was suspended shall post the notice at the retail location that was the subject of the suspension for the duration of the suspension.

(d) A retailer whose license was revoked shall post the notice at the retail location that was the subject of the revocation for a 30-day period from the effective date of the revocation.

(e) Every retailer who fails to post the notices as required by
 this section, who alters the notice provided by the board, or who removes the notice before the posting period required in subdivision (c) or (d), as appropriate, expires, shall be subject, notwithstanding Section 22981, to a civil penalty of one thousand dollars ($1,000) for each offense.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 607, Sec. 9.   (AB 2733)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

22980.6.

(a) A person that is engaged in the business of selling cigarettes or tobacco products in this state shall not possess, store, own, or make a retail sale of cannabis, cannabis products, or a product presumed to be a cannabis product pursuant to subdivision (b), or any regulations promulgated pursuant to that chapter, at any site where cigarettes or tobacco products are stored or sold. A person that violates this subdivision is subject to civil penalties and suspension or revocation of their license pursuant to subdivision (d).

(b) For purposes of this section, it shall be presumed that a product that contains or purports to contain a cannabinoid, including a
 synthetic cannabinoid, is a cannabis product, regardless of the nature or source of the cannabinoid. This presumption may be rebutted by evidence showing that the product does either of the following:

(1) Complies with Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 111920) of Part 5 of Division 104 of the Health and Safety Code and any regulations promulgated pursuant to that chapter.

(2) Meets the definition of industrial hemp, as that term is defined in Section 11018.5 of the Health and Safety Code.

(c) (1) In addition to the authority provided pursuant to Section 34016 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, upon discovery by the department that any person possesses, stores, owns, or has made a retail sale of
 cannabis or cannabis products in violation of this section, the department is authorized to seize such products at the person’s location. Any cannabis or cannabis products seized by the department pursuant to this subdivision shall be deemed forfeited and the department shall comply with the procedures set forth in Sections 30436 to 30449, inclusive, of the Revenue and Taxation Code.

(2) Any seizures or penalties authorized pursuant to this section are in addition to any criminal or civil penalties that may be imposed by law.

(d) (1) (A) A first violation of subdivision (a) involving the seizure of cannabis or cannabis products shall be punishable as follows:

 (i) Cannabis
 or cannabis products with an aggregate retail value of less than two hundred dollars ($200) shall be punishable by a civil penalty of one thousand dollars ($1,000).

(ii) Cannabis or cannabis product with an aggregate retail value of two hundred dollars ($200) or more shall be punishable by a civil penalty of two thousand dollars ($2,000).

(B) A second violation of subdivision (a) within five years involving a seizure of cannabis or cannabis products shall be punishable as follows:

(i) Cannabis or cannabis products with an aggregate retail value of less than two hundred dollars ($200) shall be punishable by a civil penalty of two thousand dollars ($2,000) and shall also result in a five-day suspension of the license.

(ii) Cannabis or cannabis product with an aggregate retail value of two hundred dollars ($200) or more shall be punishable by a civil penalty of five thousand dollars ($5,000) and shall result in a 10-day suspension of the license.

(C) A third violation of subdivision (a) within five years involving a seizure of cannabis or cannabis products shall be punishable as follows:

 (i) Cannabis or cannabis products with an aggregate retail value of less than two hundred dollars ($200) shall be punishable by a civil penalty of five thousand dollars ($5,000) and shall also result in a revocation of the license.

(ii) Cannabis or cannabis products with an aggregate retail
 value of two hundred dollars ($200) or more shall be punishable by a civil penalty of ten thousand dollars ($10,000) and shall result in a revocation of the license.

(2) The department shall ascertain as best it may the retail value based on any information within the department’s possession or that may come into its possession of the cannabis or cannabis product.

(3) The department shall issue the civil penalty in accordance with the procedures applicable to the civil penalty authorized under Section 22974.7.

(4) The department shall revoke or suspend the license of a person who violates subdivision (a) in accordance with the procedures set forth in Section 22980.3.

(e) For purposes of this section:

(1) “Cannabis” and “cannabis products” shall have the same meaning as provided in Part 14.5 (commencing with Section 34010) of Division 2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code.

(2) “Cannabinoid” and “synthetic cannabinoid” shall have the same meaning as provided in Division 10 (commencing with Section 26000).

(f) Civil penalties collected pursuant to this section shall be deposited into the Cigarette and Tobacco Products Compliance Fund created pursuant to Section 22990.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 248, Sec. 1.   (AB 8)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

22981.

Any violation of this division by any person, except as otherwise provided, is a misdemeanor. Each offense shall be punished by a fine not to exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000), or imprisonment not exceeding one year in a county jail, or both the fine and imprisonment. The court shall order any fines assessed be deposited in the Cigarette and Tobacco Products Compliance Fund.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 890, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

22982.

Any prosecution for a violation of any of the penal provisions of this division shall be instituted within four years after the commission of the offense.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 890, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

22983.

The provisions of Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 55121) of Part 30 of Division 2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code apply with respect to the collection of the fees, civil fines, and penalties imposed pursuant to this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 82, Sec. 8.   Effective June 30, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 6. Disposition of Funds [22990. - 22991.]

22990.

(a) All moneys collected pursuant to this division shall be deposited in the Cigarette and Tobacco Products Compliance Fund, which is hereby created in the State Treasury. No moneys in the Cigarette and Tobacco Products Compliance Fund shall be used to supplant state or local General Fund money for any purpose.

(b) All moneys in the Cigarette and Tobacco Products Compliance Fund are available for expenditure, upon appropriation by the Legislature, solely for the purpose of implementing, enforcing, and administering the California Cigarette and Tobacco Products Licensing Act of 2003, including the seizure and destruction of cigarettes and tobacco products.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 849, Sec. 5.   (AB 3218)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

22990.5.

Notwithstanding Sections 30124 and 30131.3 of the Revenue and Taxation Code or any other law, on or after July 1, 2019, no revenues derived from the taxes imposed upon the distribution of cigarettes and tobacco products by Article 1 (commencing with Section 30101), Article 2 (commencing with Sections 30121), and Article 3 (commencing with Section 30131) of Chapter 2 of Part 13 of Division 2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code shall be appropriated to the
 board for the purpose of implementing, enforcing, or administering the California Cigarette and Tobacco Products Licensing Act of 2003.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 699, Sec. 5.   (AB 2770)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

22990.7.

(a) The board shall report to the Legislature, Governor, and Department of Finance on or before January 1, 2019, and on and before January 1 annually thereafter, regarding the adequacy of funding for the Cigarette and Tobacco Products Licensing Act of 2003. The report shall include data and recommendations about whether the annual licensing fee funding levels are set at an appropriate level to maintain an effective enforcement program.

(b) The report to the Legislature required by subdivision (a) shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 699, Sec. 6.   (AB 2770)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

22991.

The amount of eleven million dollars ($11,000,000) is appropriated from the Cigarette and Tobacco Products Compliance Fund during the 2003–04 fiscal year to the State Board of Equalization for the purpose of implementing, enforcing, and administering the California Cigarette and Tobacco Products Licensing Act of 2003, subject to the following provisions:

(a) Spending under the appropriation made by this subdivision is limited solely to revenues in the fund that are derived from fees imposed on cigarette and tobacco product manufacturers, wholesalers, distributors, importers, and retailers.

(b) Of the total amount appropriated under this subdivision, five million four hundred thousand dollars ($5,400,000) is available for reimbursement to the Department of Justice through an interagency agreement with the board for investigation and enforcement assistance.

(c) The expenditure of any funds from the appropriation made by this subdivision shall require the prior approval of the Director of Finance. The amounts appropriated may be approved for expenditure on an allotment basis and shall be limited to the amounts necessary to carry out the operating and staffing plans for the implementation of the California Cigarette and Tobacco Products Licensing Act of 2003 as approved by the Department of Finance. The Department of Finance shall notify the Joint Legislative Budget Committee of its approval of any expenditure authorization 30 days prior to that approval.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 890, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 9. ALCOHOLIC BEVERAGES [23000. - 25762.]



CHAPTER 1. General Provisions and Definitions [23000. - 23047.]

23000.

This division shall be known and may be cited as the “Alcoholic Beverage Control Act.”

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 152.)
-------------------------------------------

23001.

This division is an exercise of the police powers of the State for the protection of the safety, welfare, health, peace, and morals of the people of the State, to eliminate the evils of unlicensed and unlawful manufacture, selling, and disposing of alcoholic beverages, and to promote temperance in the use and consumption of alcoholic beverages. It is hereby declared that the subject matter of this division involves in the highest degree the economic, social, and moral well-being and the safety of the State and of all its people. All provisions of this division shall be liberally construed for the accomplishment of these purposes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 152.)
-------------------------------------------

23001.5.

If any provision of this division or the application thereof to any person or circumstances is held invalid, such invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications of this division that can be given effect without the invalid portion or application, and to this end the provisions of this division are severable. It is the intent of the Legislature that this division would have been adopted regardless if such invalid provision had not been included or any invalid application had not been made.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 910, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

23002.

Unless the context otherwise requires, the definitions and general provisions set forth in this chapter govern the construction of this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 152.)
-------------------------------------------

23003.

“Alcohol” means ethyl alcohol, hydrated oxide of ethyl, or spirits of wine, from whatever source or by whatever process produced.
